sample_files/a/aff/de_DE.aff
SET ISO8859-1 
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwäüößáéêàâñESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWÄÜÖ

# (c) copyright by Bjoern Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de>
# my be used under the terms of the GNU General Public Licence version 2
# This licence can be found at http://www.gnu.org/copyleft/gpl.html

# inseparable ge- prefix for verbs 
PFX G N 1  
PFX G   0     ge           .                                     # rufen > gerufen 

 
# un- prefix for anything 
PFX U Y 1        
PFX U   0     un           .                                     # gesund > ungesund 

 
# Inseparable ver- prefix for verbs 
PFX V Y 1        
PFX V   0     ver          .                                     # kaufen > verkaufen 
 
 
# IN, INNEN for feminizing nouns and NEN for xxxIN nouns 
SFX F N 7 
SFX F   0     nen          in                                    # Bäuerin > Bäuerinnen 
SFX F   e     in           e                                     # Bote > Botin 
SFX F   e     innen        e       
SFX F   0     in           [^i]n                                 # Spion > Spionin 
SFX F   0     innen        [^i]n  
SFX F   0     in           [^en]                                 # Freund > Freundin 
SFX F   0     innen        [^en]   
 
 
# The question is: How to switch Capitalization off? 
# This will not serve us much otherwise! 
# LICHxx for creating adverbs and adjectives 
SFX L N 12 
SFX L   0       tlich      n                                     # verschieden > verschiedentlich 
SFX L   0       tliche     n       
SFX L   0       tlicher    n       
SFX L   0       tliches    n       
SFX L   0       tlichem    n       
SFX L   0       tlichen    n       
SFX L   0       lich       [^n]                                  # bitter > bitterlich #nn 
SFX L   0       liche      [^n]                                  #nn 
SFX L   0       licher     [^n]                                  #nn 
SFX L   0       liches     [^n]                                  #nn 
SFX L   0       lichem     [^n]                                  #nn 
SFX L   0       lichen     [^n]                                  #nn 
 
 
# 
# How to force Capitals on for heit/keit ? 
# 
# HEIT substantivation: 
SFX H N 2  
SFX H   0       heit       .                                     # gemein > Gemeinheit 
SFX H   0       heiten     .                                     # fein > Feinheiten 
 
# KEIT substantivation:  
SFX K N 2   
SFX K   0       keit       .                                     # heimlich > Heimlichkeit 
SFX K   0       keiten     .                                     # eitel > Eitelkeiten 
 

# CHEN diminuitiv:  
SFX M N 2  
SFX M   0       chen       .
SFX M   0       chens      .
 

# for adjectives:  
#SFX A Y 46        
SFX A Y 54        
SFX A   0       r          e                                     # älteste > ältester 
SFX A   0       n          e       
SFX A   0       m          e       
SFX A   0       s          e       
SFX A   0       e          [^elrß]                                # formbar > formbare 
SFX A   0       er         [^elrß]  
SFX A   0       en         [^elrß]  
SFX A   0       em         [^elrß]  
SFX A   0       es         [^elrß]  
SFX A   0       e          [^e][rl]                              # schnell > schnelle 
SFX A   0       er         [^e][rl]                              # schal > schale 
SFX A   0       en         [^e][rl]       
SFX A   0       em         [^e][rl]       
SFX A   0       es         [^e][rl]       
SFX A   0       e          [^u]er                                # schwer > schwere 
SFX A   0       er         [^u]er        
SFX A   0       en         [^u]er        
SFX A   0       em         [^u]er        
SFX A   0       es         [^u]er        
SFX A   er      re         uer                                   # teuer > teure 
SFX A   er      rer        uer                                   # sauer > saurer 
SFX A   er      ren        uer   
SFX A   er      rem        uer   
SFX A   er      res        uer   
SFX A   0       e          [eil]el                               # parallel > parallele 
SFX A   0       er         [eil]el                               # viel > viele 
SFX A   0       en         [eil]el                               # scheel > scheele 
SFX A   0       em         [eil]el       
SFX A   0       es         [eil]el       
SFX A   el      le         [^eil]el                              # eitel > eitle #nnn 
SFX A   el      ler        [^eil]el                              # simpel > simple #nnn 
SFX A   el      len        [^eil]el                              #nnn 
SFX A   el      lem        [^eil]el                              #nnn 
SFX A   el      les        [^eil]el                              #nnn 
SFX A   ß       sse        [ae]ß                                 # blaß > blasse
SFX A   ß       sser       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       ssen       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       ssem       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       sses       [ae]ß
SFX A   0       e          [^iae]ß                               # gemäß > gemäße
SFX A   0       er         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       en         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       em         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       es         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       e          eiß                                   # weiß >weiße
SFX A   0       er         eiß
SFX A   0       en         eiß
SFX A   0       em         eiß
SFX A   0       es         eiß
SFX A   ß       sse        [^e]iß                                # gewiss > gewisse
SFX A   ß       sser       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       ssen       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       ssem       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       sses       [^e]iß
#SFX A   lig     elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adelig 
#SFX A   lig     elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
#SFX A   lig     eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
#SFX A   lig     eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
#SFX A   lig     eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
#SFX A   lig     eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
#SFX A   erig    rig        [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrig 
#SFX A   erig    rige       [^hi]erig   
#SFX A   erig    riger      [^hi]erig   
#SFX A   erig    rigen      [^hi]erig   
#SFX A   erig    rigem      [^hi]erig   
#SFX A   erig    riges      [^hi]erig   
 
